Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Chapter 12 State Control of Certain Land

Law reviews. —

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

For article, “Fifty Years of Rhetoric on the Range: Reframing the Debate on Public Land Management,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 339 (1997).

For article, “The Bureau of Land Management: A Half-Century of Challenges and Change,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 345 (1997).

§ 36-12-101.
Legislative determinations.

The legislature determines:

The intent of the framers of the constitution of the United States was to guarantee to each of the states sovereignty over all matters within its boundaries except for those powers specifically granted to the United States as agent of the states;

The attempted imposition upon the state of Wyoming by the congress of the United States of a requirement in the Statehood Act that the state of Wyoming and its people “disclaim all right and title to any lands or other property not granted or confirmed to the state or its political subdivisions by or under the authority of this act, the right or title to which is held by the United States or is subject to disposition by the United States”, as a condition precedent to acceptance of Wyoming into the Union, was an act beyond the power of the congress of the United States and is thus void;

The purported right of ownership and control of the unappropriated public land in the state of Wyoming by the United States is without foundation and violates the clear intent of the constitution of the United States; and

The exercise of that dominion and control of the public land in the state of Wyoming by the United States works a severe, continuous and debilitating hardship upon the people of the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 53, § 1.

Cross references. —

For Act of Admission, see Volume 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming Land and the Law One Hundred Years After Statehood — A Perspective,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 33 (1991).

§ 36-12-102.
Management.

Upon transfer to the state of Wyoming [of] the jurisdiction and ownership of lands and mineral resources subject to this act, the board shall manage such in an orderly manner in trust for the optimum benefit and use of all the people of Wyoming and in conformity with established concepts of multiple use and sustained yield which will permit the development of uses for agriculture, grazing, recreation, minerals, timber, and the development, production and transmission of energy and other public utility services. It shall be managed in such a manner as to permit the conservation and protection of watersheds and wildlife habitat, and historic, scenic, fish and wildlife, recreational and natural values.

The board of land commissioners shall develop a plan for the transfer and management of lands and minerals subject to this act [§§

36-12-101

through

36-12-109

]. This plan will be submitted to the governor and legislature prior to January 1, 1983 and will be subject to their approval. Such a management plan shall consider:

Management of the land pursuant to subsection (a);

Policy and program regarding disposal, lease or exchange of any lands or resources acquired pursuant to this act;

Policy and program regarding public access to use of such lands;

Conservation of lands for wildlife habitat or recreational purposes; and

Program regarding use or transfer of lands to municipalities and other governmental entities for public purposes.

As used in this section:

Sustained yield means the maintenance of a high-level annual or regular periodic output of the various renewable resources of the state lands consistent with multiple use;

Multiple use means the management of the land in a combination of balanced and diverse resource uses that takes into account the long-term needs for renewable and nonrenewable resources, including but not limited to recreation, range, timber, minerals, watershed, wildlife and fish, natural, scenic, scientific and historical values, and the coordinated management of the resources without permanent impairment of the productivity of the land or the quality of the environment.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 36-12-103.
Property of the state.

Subject to valid existing rights of applicants for land, after March 30, 1980, all federal land in the state except as set forth in W.S.

36-12-109

and all water and mineral rights appurtenant not previously appropriated are the exclusive property of the state and subject to its jurisdiction and control.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 36-12-104.
Existing rights under federal law.

Until equivalent measures are enacted by the legislature, the rights and privileges of the people of this state granted under the provisions of existing federal law are preserved under administration by the board of land commissioners.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 36-12-105.
Interstate compacts.

Land in the state which has been administered by the United States under interstate compacts will continue to be administered by the state in conformity with those compacts.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 36-12-106.
Multiple use.

The land shall be used to foster, promote and encourage the optimum development of the state’s human, industrial, mineral, agricultural, water, wildlife and wildlife habitat, timber and recreational resources.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 36-12-107.
Proceeds to the general fund.

The proceeds of sales, fees, rents, royalties or other receipts from the land paid to the state under this act [§§

36-12-101

through

36-12-109

] shall be deposited in the general fund.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 36-12-108.
Enforcement of provisions; civil actions; penalties.

The state has exclusive jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of this act [§§

36-12-101

through

36-12-109

].

An individual may institute a civil action to recover damages for injury or loss sustained as the result of a violation of the provisions of this act.

Any person who attempts to exercise jurisdiction over land secured under this act in a manner not permitted by the laws of the state is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not less than two (2) years nor more than ten (10) years.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 36-12-109.
Definition.

As used in this act [§§

36-12-101

through

36-12-109

] “land” means all land and water within the exterior boundaries of the state of Wyoming except land and water:

To which title is held by a private person or entity;

To which title was held by the state or a municipality in the state before March 1, 1980;

Which is controlled by the United States department of defense on March 1, 1980;

Which was a national park, national monument, land held in trust for Indians, wildlife refuge or wilderness area established prior to January 1, 1980.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 53, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.